Hawaii statutes.
§652-12 Payment by garnishee, effect.
The taking of any goods or effects of any debtor, or the payment of any debt
due the debtor as aforesaid, or payment made by, or execution levied upon the
garnishee upon any such proceeding as aforesaid, shall be a valid discharge to
the garnishee as against the judgment debtor to the amount paid or levied,
although such proceeding may be set aside or the judgment may be reversed. [L
1876, c 35, §9; RL 1925, §2842; RL 1935, §4281; RL 1945, §10312; RL 1955,
§237-12; HRS §652-12; gen ch 1985]

Case Notes

Cited: 48 H. 349, 365, 402 P.2d 683 (1965).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next